Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB188.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 174 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall establish a state rail safety inspection program.
The cabinet may appoint and hire state rail safety inspectors and other personnel
as necessary to carry out the program.
(2) The cabinet shall apply to and enter into agreements with the Federal Railroad
Administration to participate in the federal State Safety Participation Program to
train and certify inspectors under 49 U.S.C. secs. 20103, 20105, 20106, and
20113, and 49 C.F.R. pt. 212.
(3) A state rail safety inspector may:
(a)_ Inspect mainline track, secondary track, and yard and industry track;
(b) Inspect railroad right-of-way, including adjacent or intersecting drainage,
culverts, bridges, overhead structures, and traffic and other public
crossings;
(c) Inspect yards and physical plants;
(d) Inspect train equipment;
(e) Inspect railroad operations;
(f) Inspect railroad-highway grade crossings;
(g) Inspect railroad signal and train control systems;
(h) Review and enforce safety requirements;
(i) Review maintenance and repair records; and
(j) Review railroad security measures.
(4) A state rail safety inspector may perform but is not limited to the duties described
in the federal State Safety Participation Program. An inspector may train, be
certified, and participate in any of the federal State Safety Participation Program
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1640
disciplines, including:
(a) Track, signal, and train control;
(b) Motive power and equipment;
(c) Operating practices compliance;
(d) Hazardous material; and
(e) Highway-rail grade crossings.
(5) To the extent allowed by the Federal Railroad Administration and authorized by
the cabinet, an inspector may issue citations for violations of administrative
regulations adopted pursuant to this section to ensure railroad employees and
public safety and welfare.
(6) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 174 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Railroad Transportation Advisory Board is established as an advisory body to
the executive and legislative branches of government on matters pertaining to rail
transportation.
(2) The Railroad Transportation Advisory Board shall be composed of seven (7)
members, to be appointed as follows:
(a) Four (4) members representing railroads in the Commonwealth, to be
appointed by the Governor from a list of nine (9) nominees, with a list of
three (3) nominees each supplied by:
1. The Kentucky Railroad Association;
2. A major railroad operating in Kentucky; and
3. An organized rail labor organization.
In appointing members under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the
Governor shall give consideration to including two (2) representatives from
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1640
railroad management and two (2) representatives from railroad union
labor;
(b) Two (2) at-large members who are not employed by a railroad and who
reside in a county or counties where a rail carrier operates, to be appointed
by the Governor from a list of six (6) nominees, with a list of three (3)
nominees each supplied by:
1. The Kentucky Association of Counties; and
2. The Kentucky League of Cities; and
(c) One (1) member of the Transportation Cabinet to be appointed by the
secretary of the Transportation Cabinet.
(3) After the initial appointments, members of the Railroad Transportation Advisory
Board shall serve terms of four (4) years. Members shall be eligible to succeed
themselves and shall serve until their successor is appointed.
(4) Members of the Railroad Transportation Advisory Board shall not be paid for
their services as board members and shall not be reimbursed for any expenses
involved in attending board meetings.
(5) The Railroad Transportation Advisory Board shall elect a chair and a vice chair
from its members who shall serve in those capacities until replaced. A majority of
the board shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business. The
board shall be subject to the provisions of the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS
61.870 to 61.884.
(6) The Railroad Transportation Advisory Board shall meet biennially, or when
called by the chair, or at the request of the secretary of the Transportation
Cabinet. The board shall receive assistance in carrying out its administrative
functions from the Transportation Cabinet and shall be attached to the
Transportation Cabinet for administrative purposes.
(7) The Railroad Transportation Advisory Board shall:
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1640
(a) Advise the Transportation Cabinet, the Governor's Office, and the General
Assembly on matters relating to rail transportation;
(b) Identify initiatives and priorities to reduce the frequency of blocked
highway rail crossings, improve emergency preparedness and resilience,
and improve rail safety;
(c) Evaluate the use of technology to detect and address mechanical and other
issues to reduce the risk of derailments, accidents, and other incidents; and
(d) Assess the Commonwealth's participation in a state rail safety inspection
program.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed